epay/epayservices/src/main/resources/com/otextpdf/text/pdf/hyphenation/hyph/ru.xml
Credits:
- Thanks to Dimitri Vulis for creating the hyphenation patterns in the first
  place.
- Thanks to Alex V. Alishevskikh <alex@openmechanics.net> for assisting in
  resolving legal issues with the russian hyphenation files and finding a
  legally unproblematic russian hyphenation file.
- Conversion of BRHYPHEN.TEX to ru.xml and legal clarifications by
  Jeremias Maerki <jeremias@apache.org>
-->
<!DOCTYPE hyphenation-info SYSTEM "hyphenation.dtd">
<hyphenation-info>
	<classes>
		аА
		бБ
		вВ
		гГ
		дД
		еЕ
		жЖ
		зЗ
		иИ
		йЙ
		кК
		лЛ
		мМ
		нН
		оО
		пП
		рР
		сС
		тТ
		уУ
		фФ
		хХ
		цЦ
		чЧ
		шШ
		щЩ
		ъЪ
		ыЫ
		ьЬ
		эЭ
		юЮ
		яЯ
		ёЁ
	</classes>
	<patterns>
		.аль5
		.ас6к
		.без1
		.бе2зу
		.ве2с1к
		.ве5твл
		.во5в
		.го2сб
		.дво2е
		.джо6у
		.ди2а
		.до1см
		.ез5
		.жер5т6
		.зау2
		.за1ш2
		.зо2о3
		.иг2
		.из1н
		.из1р
		.ис1ти
		.ис5тр
		.ле1м
		.лес2к
		.ль2
		.ме5д6л
		.ме6жа
		.мели6
		.ми2нат
		.на5в6
		.на1с
		.на1ч2н
		.неа6
		.не1в
		.не6ври
		.не1з2
		.не5л
		.нос5к
		.об1ле
		.об5лив
		.об5лит
		.об1ло
		.об1осн
		.об1ре
		.об1ру
		.об1у2ч
		.ог1н
		.оз2
		.ос2п
		.от3в
		.от1р
		.по1в2
		.по1ж2
		.полу1
		.пре1л
		.при1ч
		.ра2с1та
		.ра2сто
		.рей2с1
		.та5см
		.тек1с
		.тран2с1
		.ть2
		.ук2
		.умы6ш5
		.ур6в
		.фа5у
		.хла2
		.ча2е
		а1а
		аа6б
		а1ба
		5абата
		а1бе
		абе5ст
		а1би
		а1бла
		а1бле
		а1бли
		а1бло
		а1блу
		а1блы
		а1бо
		а1бра
		а1бре
		а1бри
		а1бро
		а1бру
		а1бры
		а5бря
		а1бу
		а1бх
		а1бы
		а1бье
		а1бьи
		а1бью
		а1бья
		а1бю
		а1бя
		а1ва
		1авг
		а1ве
		а1ви
		а1вла
		а1вле
		а1вли
		а1вло
		а1влу
		а1влы
		а1во
		а2вот
		а6вп
		а1вра
		а1вре
		а1ври
		а1вро
		а1вру
		а1вры
		а1ву
		а1вы
		а1вье
		а1вьи
		а1вью
		а1вья
		а5вэ
		а1вю
		а1вя
		а1га
		ага5с6
		а5гв
		аг1д
		а1ге
		а1ги
		а1гл
		а1гла
		а1гле
		а1гли
		а1гло
		а1глу
		а1глы
		а1го
		аго5с
		а1гра
		а1гре
		а1гри
		1а1гро
		а1гру
		а1гры
		а3гу
		а1гы
		а1гье
		а1гьи
		а1гью
		а1гья
		а1гю
		а1гя
		а1да
		ад1аге
		а1два
		а1две
		а1дви
		а1дво
		а1дву
		а1двы
		а1де
		а1дж
		аджо6
		ад5зи
		а1ди
		ади2о
		а2д1л
		а1дла
		а1дле
		а1дли
		а1дло
		а1длу
		а1длы
		1адм
		а1до
		а3дра
		а1дре
		ад5рез
		а1дри
		а1дро
		а1дру
		а1дры
		а1ду
		а1дц
		а1ды
		а1дье
		а1дьи
		а1дью
		а1дья
		а1дю
		а1дя
		а1е
		ае2б
		ае6ди
		ае2л
		а1жа
		а1же
		а1жж
		а1жи
		а1жм
		а1жо
		а1жр
		а1жу
		а1жье
		а1жьи
		а1жью
		а1жья
		2аз
		а1за
		аз1ве
		аз1ви
		аз1во
		аз1да
		аз5до
		аз5дро
		аз5ду
		а1зе
		а1зи
		азиа6
		ази5м6
		а1зо
		аз1р
		а5зу
		аз5убе
		аз6ус
		а6зуч
		а1зы
		а1зье
		а1зьи
		а1зью
		а1зья
		а1зю
		а1зя
		а1и
		аи2г
		а6ид
		аиз5
		аи6мет
		аи2ни
		а2их
		2ай
		ай2ма
		а1ка
		а1ква
		а1кве
		а1кви
		а1кво
		а1кву
		а1квы
		а1ке
		а1ки
		а1кла
		а1кле
		а1кли
		а1кло
		а1клу
		а1клы
		ак1н
		а1ко
		а1кра
		а1кре
		а1кри
		а1кро
		а1кру
		а1кры
		ак1с
		а1ку
		а1кы
		а1кье
		а1кьи
		а1кью
		а1кья
		а1кю
		а1кя
		а1ла
		а2лаб
		1алг
		а1ле
		а5ли
		6алин
		а1ло
		а1лу
		а1лы
		а1лье
		а1льи
		а1лью
		а1лья
		а1лю
		а1ля
		2а1ма
		а1ме
		а1ми
		а1мла
		а1мле
		а1мли
		а1мло
		а1млу
		а1млы
		а1мно
		а1мо
		амо1с
		1ампе
		а1мра
		а1мре
		а1мри
		а1мро
		а1мру
		а1мры
		а1му
		ам1ч
		а1мш
		а1мы
		а1мье
		а1мьи
		а1мью
		а1мья
		а1мю
		а1мя
		а1на
		а1не
		а1ни
		а6нинс
		а1но
		а2н1об
		6анос
		а1нра
		а1нре
		а1нри
		а1нро
		а1нру
		а1нры
		ан2с1кр
		ан2сп
		ан2сц
		а1ну
		а2н5уз
		а1ны
		а1нье
		а1ньи
		а1нью
		а1нья
		а1ню
		а1ня
		2а3о
		ао6к
		ао2п
		ао2с
		аот5р
		а1па
		а1пе
		а1пи
		а1пла
		а1пле
		а1пли
		а1пло
		а1плу
		а1плы
		а1по
		1апп
		а1пра
		а1пре
		а1при
		апри2зн
		а1про
		а1пру
		а1пры
		а5п2т
		а1пта
		а1пте
		а1пти
		а1пто
		а1пту
		а1пты
		а1пу
		а1пы
		а1пье
		а1пьи
		а1пью
		а1пья
		а1пю
		а1пя
		а1р6а
		а1ре
		а1ри
		5арме
		а1ро
		ар2т1ор
		а1ру
		а1ры
		а1рье
		а1рьи
		а1рью
		а1рья
		а1рю
		а1ря
		а1са
		а1сва
		а1све
		а1сви
		а1сво
		а1сву
		а1свы
		6а1се
		а1си
		ас1к
		а1сква
		а1скве
		а1скви
		а1скво
		а1скву
		а1сквы
		а1скра
		а1скре
		а1скри
		а1скро
		а1скру
		а1скры
		ас5лет
		ас5лям
		ас5лях
		ас5ми
		а1со
		ас3по
		ас1пу
		а1сра
		а1сре
		а1сри
		а1сро
		а1сру
		а1сры
		1ассиг
		асс6п
		а1ста
		а1ства
		а1стве
		а1стви
		а1ство
		а1ству
		а1ствы
		а1ствье
		а1ствьи
		а1ствью
		а1ствья
		а1ствю
		а1ствя
		а1сте
		а1сти
		а1сто
		а6с5том
		а1стра
		а1стре
		а1стри
		а1стро
		а1стру
		а1стры
		а1стрье
		а1стрьи
		а1стрью
		а1стрья
		а1стрю
		а1стря
		а1сту
		а1сты
		а1стье
		а1стьи
		а1стью
		а1стья
		а1стю
		а1стя
		а6с5тяг
		а6стян
		а1су
		ас1ч
		а1с2ше
		а1сы
		а1сье
		а1сьи
		а1сью
		а1сья
		а1сю
		а1ся
		а1та
		1атак
		а1тва
		а1тве
		а1т5ви
		а1тво
		а1тву
		а1твы
		а1те
		ате2с1
		а1ти
		а1то
		а6томн
		а1тра
		а1тре
		а1три
		а1тро
		а1тру
		а1тры
		а1ту
		а1ты
		а1тье
		а1тьи
		а1тью
		а1тья
		а1тю
		а1тя
		а1у
		а2ум
		а2ун
		а2ус
		аус5к
		ау2т1р
		а3уч
		ау2чи
		а2уэ
		а1фа
		а1фе
		а1фи
		а1фла
		а1фле
		а1фли
		а1фло
		а1флу
		а1флы
		а1фо
		а1фра
		а1фре
		а1фри
		а1фро
		а1фру
		а1фры
		а1фу
		а1фье
		а1фьи
		а1фью
		а1фья
		а1фю
		а1фя
		а1ха
		а1хда
		а1хде
		а1хди
		а1хдо
		а1хду
		а1хды
		а1хе
		а1хи
		а1хо
		а1ху
		а1хы
		а1хье
		а1хьи
		а1хью
		а1хья
		а1хю
		а1хя
		а1ца
		а1це
		а1ци
		а1цо
		а1цу
		а1цы
		а1цье
		а1цьи
		а1цью
		а1цья
		а1ча
		а1че
		ачес2
		а1чи
		ач1та
		а1чу
		а1чье
		а1чьи
		а1чью
		а1чья
		2аш
		а1ша
		а6шв
		а1шва
		а1шве
		а1шви
		а1шво
		а1шву
		а1швы
		а1ше
		а5ши
		а1шла
		а1шле
		а1шли
		а1шло
		а1шлу
		а1шлы
		а1шо
		а1шра
		а1шре
		а1шри
		а1шро
		а1шру
		а1шры
		аш1та
		а1шу
		а1шье
		а1шьи
		а1шью
		а1шья
		а5щ
		а1ща
		а1ще
		а1щи
		а1що
		а1щу
		а1щье
		а1щьи
		а1щью
		а1щья
		а1ы
		а1э1
		а2эр
		а1ю
		а1я
		ая2з
		ба6кв
		бас1м
		ба6х5р
		б1аэ
		б1б
		1б1в
		6б1г
		б1д
		1бе
		бег5н
		бе6дл
		бе2з1а2
		без1д2
		бе2з1и
		бе2зо2
		бео6
		бе2с1к
		2бес3п
		бе2ста
		бес1ч
		б1ж
		бз2
		1бзд2
		б5зе
		5бзж
		б5зи
		б1зо
		5би2о
		био5с
		би6ск
		б5к
		1бл
		б1лав
		2блас
		2блд
		б1лег
		бле2с5к
		б5лиза
		бл1исп
		б1лож
		б1лом
		б6луд
		6блх
		2бль5
		6б1м
		2б1н
		б1об
		бод6р
		бо5дро
		бо1жж
		бо1з
		бо6зу
		бо1рв
		борт5
		бор6тр
		бо1ск
		бо2соб
		бо5с6п
		бо1с2с
		5бот
		бо6тв
		бо1т2л
		5боц
		б1п
		6бр.
		бра6сл
		бра3у
		б1рыв
		б5рыг
		б5рыд
		6б1с2
		2б1т
		1бу
		б1уг
		бу2гл
		б1у2сл
		б1ф
		б1х
		2б1ц
		б1ч
		б1ш
		б1щ
		б2ъ
		бэ1р
		1бю
		1бя
		1ваг
		5вак
		ван5с6ц
		ва1ст
		вах1
		в1б
		в6би
		в1в
		в1г
		в1д
		вдо1с
		1вег
		1велл
		ве5ола
		вео2с
		вер2х1р
		1вз2
		в2за
		взъ2
		взыс5
		ви6ак
		ви2ам
		ви6ар
		ви6ас
		ви5аф
		ви6дл
		вин6др
		5винт
		6в5инф
		ви5ол
		вист5л
		1ви2х1
		в1к
		вк1н
		в6кус
		1вл
		2в1лаб
		2в1лаг
		2в1лес
		вли6е
		6в5лик
		6в5лич
		2вль
		в1ма
		2в1ми
		в1мо
		в6мого
		в6моч
		в1н
		в6нес
		в2нуш
		вобез5
		во1вк
		во1г
		воз1в
		вои2с
		1вок
		во2с1к
		во2стр
		во6хр
		1воя
		1вп
		в5по6л
		1вр2
		2вр.
		вра2ж5д
		в5рас
		6в5рац
		6в5риты
		в5рор
		врос5
		вро5т
		в1с2
		1в2са
		в6сег
		5всем
		6вск
		1в2сп
		1в2сх
		1в2сю
		в1т
		вто3к2
		6в5тр
		1ву2а
		1вуд
		вуе6д
		ву1з
		вуо6
		ву2х1
		в1ф
		в1х
		в6ход
		в1ц
		в1ча
		в1чи
		в1ш
		1в2шив
		в1щ
		1въ2
		вы1ск
		вы5сп
		вы1с2с
		вы1х
		1вю
		1га
		га2у
		2г1б
		5гви
		г1вы
		5гвью
		г1г
		г5до
		гели2о
		ге2н1ин
		ге2нр
		ге6об
		ге2од
		ге6ок
		ге6он
		ге2оп
		ге6ори
		ге2ос
		ге2от
		ге2оц
		г1з
		2г1к
		гко1в
		6гл.
		6г5лай
		6глв
		1гля
		г1м
		г1ни
		го1з
		го2с1а
		гос1к
		гос3с
		го6стел
		го2с1тр
		го1сш
		2г1п
		6грек
		2гроп
		2г1с
		г2сб
		2г5т
		6гф
		6г1х
		г1ц
		г1ч
		2г1ш
		г1э
		да6бе
		да2ген
		да2др
		2далг
		да2пр
		6д1б
		дв6
		2д1ва
		2д1ве
		две2с5к
		2д1вид
		6двинт
		6д5винч
		2д1вис
		д5вк
		2д1вод
		дву1ш
		6д5вы
		д1г2
		д5д6
		5деб
		де2з1а2
		де2з1и2о
		де2з1о2
		де2о5
		5деф
		де5х
		5джа
		5джия
		дж5л
		дж1м
		дж1р
		6дз.
		1дзе.
		д5зем
		д1зо
		ди2ад
		ди6али
		ди2ам
		6д5и6де
		2динс
		2д1инф
		ди2об
		ди5он
		ди2оп
		ди2о5с
		ди6п5т
		ди2с1е
		ди2ск
		ди2сто
		ди2с1тр
		ди5х
		2д1к
		д1ла
		д5лед
		д1леж
		5д6лей
		д5лени
		д1ло
		д1лы
		5длю
		2д1м
		д2мс
		д2м1ч
		д1н
		1дневн
		дно5д
		1дняш
		2д1обл
		до6бла
		6добъ
		1дов
		до1д2
		до1з
		доис6
		2докт
		до5мно
		до5рва
		5доре
		до2ру
		2д1о2си
		до1сн
		до1с2п
		д5отр
		1доч
		до1ш2
		д1п
		2др.
		5д6раж
		д1рас
		5д6рая
		д1реж
		д5реш
		дри5с
		д1рих
		6д5роз
		2дрс
		д1руб
		6д5руч
		2д1рыв
		д1ряд
		5дрят
		2д1с
		дс3кн
		2д1т
		1дум
		2дуо5
		ду6оп
		ду6ос
		ду6рал
		6д5у6си
		1дух
		2д1уэ
		2д1ф
		д1х
		д1ч
		2д1ш2
		5дыв
		2дь.
		1дье
		5дью
		1дья
		д1э
		1дюн
		е1а
		еа2б
		еа2д
		еа5до
		е3а2з
		е6ако
		е6ас
		еа2то
		еа6у
		е1ба
		е1бе
		ебе5зо5
		е1би
		е1бла
		е1бле
		е1бли
		е1бло
		е1блу
		е1блы
		е1бо
		е5бор
		е1бр
		е1бра
		е1бре
		е1бри
		е1бро
		е1бру
		е1бры
		е1бу
		е1бы
		е1бье
		е1бьи
		е1бью
		е1бья
		е1бю
		е1бя
		е1ва
		2е1ве
		е1ви
		ев6ку
		е1вла
		е1вле
		е1вли
		е1вло
		е1влу
		е1влы
		ев2ним
		ев2нят
		е1во
		6евол
		ево2с
		ев2п
		ев5па
		2евр
		е1вра
		е1вре
		е1ври
		е2вро
		е1вру
		е1вры
		е1ву
		ев1ч
		евъе5х
		е1вы
		е1вье
		е1вьи
		е1вью
		е1вья
		е1вю
		е1вя
		е1га
		е1гд
		е1ге
		е1ги
		е1гла
		е1гле
		е1гли
		е1гло
		е1глу
		е1глы
		ег1не
		ег6но
		е1го
		е1гра
		е1гре
		е1гри
		е1гро
		е1гру
		е1гры
		е1гу
		е1гы
		е1гье
		е1гьи
		е1гью
		е1гья
		е1гю
		е1гя
		е1да
		е6д5аб
		е2д1ап
		е1два
		е1две
		е1дви
		е1дво
		е1дву
		е1двы
		е1де
		е5дже
		е1ди
		е6д5исп
		е2д1ию
		е2дл
		е1дла
		е3дле
		е1д1ли
		е1дло
		е1длу
		е1длы
		ед5ля
		е1до
		ед5о6пр
		ед1осм
		е2дотв
		е1дра
		е1дре
		е1дри
		е1дро
		е1дру
		е1дры
		е1ду
		е6д5уг
		е6думы
		е1ды
		е1дье
		е1дьи
		е1дью
		е1дья
		е1дю
		е1дя
		е1е
		е2ева
		ее6г
		е6ема
		е6еп
		е1жа
		ежа6т
		еж5ато
		е2ждю
		е1же
		е1жж
		е5жи
		еж1м
		е1жо
		еж1р
		е1жу
		е1жье
		е1жьи
		е1жью
		е1жья
		е1за
		ез5ви
		ез1во
		ез1да
		езди2
		ез5до.
		ез1др
		ез1ду
		ез1ды
		е1зе
		е1зи
		е1зо
		ез1от
		е1зу
		е1зы
		е1зье
		е1зьи
		е1зью
		е1зья
		е1зю
		е1зя
		е1и
		еи2г
		еи2д
		еи2м
		е1ка
		е1ква
		е1кве
		е1кви
		е1кво
		е1кву
		е1квы
		е1ке
		е1ки
		е1кла
		е1кле
		е1кли
		е1кло
		е1клу
		е1клы
		ек1н
		2е1ко
		е1кра
		е1кре
		е1кри
		е1кро
		е1кру
		е1кры
		ек1ск
		експо6
		ек1сту
		е1ку
		е1кы
		е1кье
		е1кьи
		е1кью
		е1кья
		е1кю
		е1кя
		е1ла
		е1ле
		е1ли
		е1ло
		е1лу
		е1лы
		е1лье
		е1льи
		е1лью
		е1лья
		е1лю
		е1ля
		е1ма
		е1ме
		е1ми
		е1мла
		е1мле
		е1мли
		е1мло
		е1млу
		е1млы
		ем1не
		е1мо
		ем6пт
		е1мра
		е1мре
		е1мри
		е1мро
		е1мру
		е1мры
		е1му
		ем1ч
		е1мы
		е1мье
		е1мьи
		е1мью
		е1мья
		е1мю
		е1мя
		е1на
		е1не
		е1ни
		е1но
		2енр
		е1нра
		е1н5ре
		е1н1ри
		е1нро
		е1нру
		е1нры
		е1ну
		е1ны
		е1нье
		е1ньи
		е1нью
		е1нья
		е1ню
		е1ня
		2е1о
		ео5а
		ео2б
		ео5ба
		еоб1л
		еобо1
		е3о2гран
		е2оди
		ео2ж
		е5оид
		ео6ки
		ео2кон
		е5ол.
		е5олы
		е5оля
		е3он.
		е6опа
		е2опл
		ео6поз
		ео2пр
		ео6пу
		ео6пы
		е2оро
		ео2ру
		ео1с
		ео2са
		ео6св
		ео2се
		ео6соб
		ео6су
		ео6сц
		е6оте
		е5о6фор
		ео6хв
		е5охл
		ео2че
		ео2щ
		е1па
		е1пе
		е1пи
		е1пла
		е1пле
		е1пли
		е1пло
		е1плу
		е1плы
		е1по
		е1пра
		е1пре
		е1при
		еприе2
		е1про
		е1пру
		е1пры
		е1пта
		е1пте
		е1пти
		е1пто
		е1пту
		е1пты
		е1пу
		е1пы
		е1пье
		е1пьи
		е1пью
		е1пья
		е1пю
		е1пя
		е1ра
		ер1аэ
		ер5ва.
		ер1ват
		ер1вы
		е1ре
		ере1г
		ере1зв
		ере1сс
		е1ри
		ер6кл
		е1ро
		еро2б
		ер5тли
		ер1тя
		е1ру
		е2р1у2п
		ер2хи
		е1ры
		е1рье
		е1рьи
		е1рью
		е1рья
		е1рю
		е1ря
		е1са
		е1с6б
		е1сва
		е1све
		е1сви
		е1сво
		е1сву
		е1свы
		е1сг
		е1сд
		е1се
		е1си
		е1ск
		ес5кал
		е1сква
		е1скве
		е1скви
		е1скво
		е1скву
		е1сквы
		ес6кл
		е1скра
		е1скре
		е1скри2
		ескрип1
		е1скро
		е1скру
		е1скры
		е1см
		е1со
		есо6ск
		2ес1п
		е1сра
		е1сре
		е1сри
		е1сро
		е1сру
		е1сры
		есс2п
		е1ста
		е5ста.
		ес1тар
		е1ства
		е1стве
		е1стви
		е1ство
		е1ству
		е1ствы
		е1ствье
		е1ствьи
		е1ствью
		е1ствья
		е1ствю
		е1ствя
		е1сте
		е1сти
		е6стиг
		ест5л
		е1сто
		е1стра
		е1стре
		е1стри
		е1стро
		е1стру
		е1стры
		е1стрье
		е1стрьи
		е1стрью
		е1стрья
		е1стрю
		е1стря
		е1сту
		е1сты
		е1стье
		е1стьи
		е1стью
		е1стья
		е1стю
		е1стя
		е1су
		е1сы
